Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2224.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1.1. Title 46, chapter 2, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 46-232, to read: START_STATUTE46-232. Appropriation; department of economic security; produce incentive program; exemption A. The sum of $1,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 and each fiscal year thereafter to the department of economic security to implement the produce incentive program established pursuant to section 46-231. B. The appropriation made in subsection A of this section is exempt from the provisions of section 35-190 relating to lapsing of appropriations. END_STATUTE